Utah statutes.
41-12a-306.   Claims adjustment by persons with owner's or operator's
security other than insurance.
(1)  An owner or operator of a motor vehicle with respect to whom owner's or
operator's security is maintained by a means other than an insurance policy
under Subsection 41-12a-103(9)(a) or (b), shall refer all bodily injury claims
against the owner's or operator's security to an independent adjuster licensed
under Title 31A, Chapter 26, Insurance Adjusters, or to an attorney.
(2)  Unless otherwise provided by contract, any motor vehicle claim adjustment
expense incurred by a person maintaining owner's or operator's security by a
means other than an insurance policy under Subsection 41-12a-103(9)(a) or (b),
shall be paid by the person who maintains this type of owner's or operator's
security.
(3)  Owners and operators of motor vehicles maintaining owner or operator's
security by a means other than an insurance policy under Subsection
41-12a-103(9)(a) or (b) are subject to the claim adjustment provisions of
Title 31A, Chapter 26, Part 3, Claim Practices, in connection with claims
against such persons which arise out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of
a motor vehicle.
(4)  In addition to other penalties and remedies available for failure to
abide by this section, the department may require any person violating this
section to maintain owner's or operator's security only in the manner
specified under Subsection 41-12a-103(9)(a).
